test/src/morphology/N-ava_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ӓвӓ: # Noun 'mother'
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Nom: ӓвӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Gen: ӓвӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Acc: ӓвӓм
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Com: ӓвӓге
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Dat: ӓвӓлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ine: ӓвӓштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ill: [ӓвӓшкӹ, ӓвӓш]
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Lat: ӓвӓэш
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Comp: ӓвӓлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Abe: ӓвӓде
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Nom: ӓвӓвлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Gen: ӓвӓвлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Acc: ӓвӓвлӓм
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Com: ӓвӓвлӓге
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Dat: ӓвӓвлӓлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ine: ӓвӓвлӓштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ill: [ӓвӓвлӓшкӹ, ӓвӓвлӓш]
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Lat: ӓвӓвлӓэш
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Comp: ӓвӓвлӓлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Abe: ӓвӓвлӓде

     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Nom: [ӓвӓм, ӓвӓэм] # х2 ӓвӓэмжӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Gen: ӓвӓмӹн
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Acc: ӓвӓмӹм
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Com: ӓвӓмге
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Dat: ӓвӓмлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Ine: ӓвӓмӹштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Ill: ӓвӓмӹшкӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Lat: ӓвӓмӹш
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Comp: ӓвӓмлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Abe: ӓвӓмде
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: [ӓвӓмвлӓ, ӓвӓэмвлӓ] # х3
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ӓвӓвлӓэм
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Gen: ӓвӓмвлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Acc: ӓвӓмвлӓм
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Com: ӓвӓмвлӓге
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: ӓвӓмвлӓлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Ine: ӓвӓмвлӓштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Ill: ӓвӓмвлӓшкӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: ӓвӓмвлӓш
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Comp: ӓвӓмвлӓлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: ӓвӓмвлӓде

     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Sg+Nom: [ӓвӓт, ӓвӓэт]
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Sg+Gen: ӓвӓтӹн
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Sg+Acc: ӓвӓтӹм
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Sg+Com: ӓвӓтге
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Sg+Dat: ӓвӓтлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Sg+Ine: ӓвӓтӹштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Sg+Ill: ӓвӓтӹшкӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Sg+Lat: ӓвӓтӹш
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Sg+Comp: ӓвӓтлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Sg+Abe: ӓвӓтде
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Pl+Nom: [ӓвӓтвлӓ, ӓвӓэтвлӓ] 
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ӓвӓвлӓэт
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Pl+Gen: ӓвӓтвлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Pl+Acc: ӓвӓтвлӓм
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Pl+Com: ӓвӓтвлӓге
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Pl+Dat: ӓвӓтвлӓлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ӓвӓвлӓлӓнет
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Pl+Ine: ӓвӓтвлӓштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Pl+Ill: ӓвӓтвлӓшкӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Pl+Lat: ӓвӓтвлӓэш
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Pl+Comp: ӓвӓтвлӓлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg2+Pl+Abe: ӓвӓтвлӓде

     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Sg+Nom: ӓвӓжӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Sg+Gen: ӓвӓжӹн
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Sg+Acc: ӓвӓжӹм
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Sg+Com: ӓвӓжӹге 
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Sg+Dat: ӓвӓжӹлӓн 
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Sg+Ine: ӓвӓжӹштӹ #??
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Sg+Ill: ӓвӓжӹшкӹ #??
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: ӓвӓшкӹжӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3: ӓвӓэшӹжӹ #
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Sg+Comp: ӓвӓжӹлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Sg+Abe: ӓвӓжӹде
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Pl+Nom: ӓвӓжӹвлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ӓвӓвлӓжӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Pl+Gen: ӓвӓжӹвлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Pl+Acc: ӓвӓжӹвлӓм
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Pl+Com: ӓвӓжӹвлӓге
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Pl+Dat: ӓвӓжӹвлӓлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Pl+Ine: ӓвӓжӹвлӓштӹ #??
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Pl+Ill: ӓвӓжӹвлӓшкӹ #??
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Pl+Lat: ӓвӓжӹвлӓш #??
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Pl+Comp: ӓвӓжӹвлӓлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+PxSg3+Pl+Abe: ӓвӓжӹвлӓде


#ӓвӓт, ӓвӓэт, ӓвӓэтшӹ, 
#ӓвӓжӹ, 
